District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.21

Waiver of licensure requirements — Demonstration of performance.

The Board of Respiratory Care shall waive the educational and examination requirements for any applicant for licensure as a respiratory therapist who can demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the Board, that he or she has been performing the functions of a respiratory therapist, as defined in this chapter, on a full-time or substantially full-time basis continually at least 12 months immediately preceding March 14, 1995, and is qualified to do so on the basis of pertinent education, training, experience and demonstrated current competence, provided that the application for the license is made within 12 months of October 17, 2002.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 720
as added Mar. 14, 1995, D.C. Law 10-203, § 2(h), 41 DCR 7707
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 7(c), 43 DCR 530
Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-197, § 2(a), 49 DCR 7642

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3307.21.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-197 substituted “12 months of October 17, 2002” for “24 months of March 14, 1995”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Education and Examination Exemption for Respiratory Care Practitioners Temporary Amendment Act of 2002(D.C. Law 14-142, May 21, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 5059).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Education and Examination Exemption for Respiratory Care Practitioners Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-280, February 25, 2002, 49 DCR 2293).